Nevada, session 83, AB332.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 616A.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616A.060 “Association’s administrator” means a person who is
[employed] :
1. Employed by or has contracted with the board of trustees of
an association of self-insured public or private employers to carry
out the policies of the board of trustees ; and [to be]
2. At the direction of the board of trustees, responsible [for] to
carry out the daily [operation] operations of the association [.] ,
including, without limitation, to meet the obligations of the
association pursuant to NRS 616B.362.
Sec. 2. NRS 616B.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.353 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers shall:
(a) Execute an indemnity agreement jointly and severally
binding the association and each member of the association to
secure the payment of all compensation due pursuant to chapters
616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS. The indemnity agreement must be
in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. An association may add
provisions to the indemnity agreement if they are first approved by
the Commissioner.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, maintain a
policy of specific and aggregate excess insurance in a form and
amount required by the Commissioner. The excess insurance must
be written by an insurer approved by the Commissioner. To
determine the amount of excess insurance required, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(1) The number of members in the association;
(2) If the association is an association of self-insured public
employers, the types of governmental services provided by the
members of the association;
(3) If the association is an association of self-insured private
employers, the classifications of employment of the members of the
association;
(4) The number of years the association has been in
existence; and
(5) Such other information as the Commissioner deems
necessary.
-
*AB332*

– 4 –
 Nothing in this paragraph prohibits an association from
purchasing secondary excess insurance in addition to the excess
insurance required by this paragraph.
(c) Collect an annual assessment from each member of the
association in an aggregate amount of at least $250,000 or in an
aggregate amount which the Commissioner determines is
satisfactory based on an annual review conducted by the
Commissioner of the actuarial solvency of the association.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), deposit as
security with the Commissioner a bond executed by the association
as principal, and by a licensed surety, payable to the State of
Nevada, and conditioned upon the payment of compensation for
injuries and occupational diseases to their employees. The bond
must be in an amount determined by the Commissioner to be
reasonably sufficient to ensure payment of such compensation, but
in no event may it be less than $100,000.
(e) In lieu of a bond, deposit with the Commissioner a like
amount of lawful money of the United States or any other form of
security authorized by NRS 100.065. If security is provided in the
form of a savings certificate, certificate of deposit or investment
certificate, the certificate must state that the amount is unavailable
for withdrawal except upon order of the Commissioner.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, in addition to
complying with the requirements of subsection 1, an association of
self-insured private employers shall:
(a) At the time of initial qualification and until the association
has operated successfully as a qualified association of self-insured
private employers for 3 years, as determined by the Commissioner,
have a combined tangible net worth of all members in the
association of at least $2,500,000, as evidenced by a statement of
tangible net worth provided to the Division of Insurance of the
Department of Business and Industry by an independent certified
public accountant; or
(b) After 3 years of successful operation as a qualified
association of self-insured private employers, as determined by the
Commissioner, have combined net cash flows from operating
activities plus net cash flows from financing activities of all
members in the association of five times the average of claims paid
for each of the last 3 years or $7,500,000, whichever is less.
3. In lieu of complying with the requirements of subsection 2,
the association’s administrator shall ensure that a solvency bond, in
a form prescribed by the Commissioner and in an aggregate amount
of at least $2,500,000, is deposited with the Commissioner by the
association or members of the association on behalf of the
association.
-
*AB332*

– 5 –
4. The association’s administrator shall deposit with the
Commissioner a bond executed by the association’s administrator as
principal, and by a licensed surety, payable to the State of Nevada,
and conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties.
The bond must be in an amount determined by the Commissioner.
5. [Any third-party administrator providing claims services for
the association shall deposit with the Commissioner a bond executed
by the third-party administrator as principal, and by a licensed
surety, payable to the State of Nevada, and conditioned upon the
faithful performance of its duties. The bond must be in an amount
determined by the Commissioner.
6.] The Commissioner may increase or decrease the amount of
any bond or money required to be deposited by this section in
accordance with chapter 681B of NRS and the Commissioner’s
regulations for loss reserves in casualty insurance. If the
Commissioner requires an association [,] or association’s
administrator [or third-party administrator] to increase its deposit,
the Commissioner may specify the form of the additional security.
The association [,] or association’s administrator [or third-party
administrator] shall comply with such a requirement within 60 days
after receiving notice from the Commissioner.
[7.] 6. The Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public and
Private Employers is hereby created in the State Agency Fund for
Bonds. All money received by the Commissioner pursuant to this
section must be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of
the Account. All claims against this Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
Sec. 3. NRS 616B.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.365 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers must be operated by a board of trustees consisting of at
least five members whom the members of the association elect for
terms set forth in the bylaws of the association. If the association is
an association of self-insured:
(a) Public employers, the members of the board of trustees must
be officers or employees of the public employers who are members
of the association.
(b) Private employers, at least two-thirds of the members of the
board of trustees must be employees, officers or directors of the
members of the association. No association’s administrator or third-
party administrator employed by the association, or any owner,
officer, employee or other person affiliated with the association’s
administrator or third-party administrator, may serve as a member of
the board of trustees. Each member of the board of trustees must be
a resident of this State or an officer of a corporation authorized to do
business in this State.
-
*AB332*

– 6 –
2. The board of trustees of an association shall:
(a) Ensure the prompt payment of any compensation due
pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS.
(b) Take such actions as are necessary to protect the assets of the
association.
(c) Employ full-time an association’s administrator to carry out
the policies of the board of trustees and perform such duties as the
board delegates to him or her. An association’s administrator shall
not directly administer claims or perform any of the other duties
assigned to a third-party administrator.
(d) Employ a third-party administrator to carry out the duties set
forth in NRS 616B.503.
(e) Employ an independent certified public accountant to
prepare the statement of financial condition required by
NRS 616B.404.
(f) Maintain minutes of its meetings and make the minutes
available for inspection by the Commissioner.
3. The board of trustees of an association shall not:
(a) Extend credit to any member of the association for the
payment of that member’s annual assessment, except pursuant to a
payment plan approved by the Commissioner.
(b) Borrow any money from the association or in the name of
the association, except in the ordinary course of its business, without
the prior approval of the Commissioner.
Sec. 4. NRS 616B.371 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.371 1. An association’s administrator [employed by an
association of self-insured public or private employers, or an
employee, officer or director of an association’s administrator, may
not be an employee, officer or director of a third-party administrator
employed by the association or] may have a direct or indirect
financial interest in the third-party administrator [of the] employed
by the board of trustees of an association [.] of self-insured public
or private employers.
2. [The third-party administrator of an association of self-
insured public or private employers, or an employee, officer or
director of the third-party administrator, may not be an employee,
officer or director of an association’s administrator employed by the
association or have a direct or indirect financial interest in that
association’s administrator.
3.] Any contract entered into by an association of self-insured
public or private employers and a third-party administrator must
include a provision which states that, unless the Commissioner
otherwise provides, the third-party administrator shall administer
-
*AB332*

– 7 –
any claim or other obligation of the association to its conclusion
during the period of the contract.
Sec. 5. NRS 616B.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.440 1. For the purposes of NRS 616B.350 to
616B.446, inclusive, an association of self-insured public or private
employers is insolvent if it is unable to pay its outstanding
obligations as they mature in the regular course of its business.
2. If an association of self-insured public or private employers
becomes insolvent, institutes any voluntary proceeding pursuant to
the Bankruptcy Act or is named in any voluntary proceeding
thereunder, makes a general or special assignment for the benefit of
creditors or fails to pay compensation pursuant to chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS after an order for the
payment of any claim becomes final, the Commissioner may, after
giving at least 10 days’ notice to the association and any insurer or
guarantor, use money or interest on securities, sell securities or
institute legal proceedings on surety bonds deposited with the
Commissioner pursuant to NRS 679B.175 to the extent necessary to
make those payments.
3. A licensed surety providing a surety bond pursuant to NRS
616B.353 may terminate liability on its surety bond by giving the
Commissioner and the association [,] or association’s administrator
[or third-party administrator] 90 days’ written notice. The
termination does not limit liability that was incurred under the
surety bond before the termination.
Sec. 6. NRS 616B.554 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.554 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers, which may
be used only to make payments in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 616B.557 and 616B.560. The Board shall administer the
Account based upon recommendations made by the Administrator
pursuant to subsection [8.] 7.
2. All [assessments,] penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the Board for the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers must be
delivered to the custody of the State Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees of self-insured employers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the Board.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
-
*AB332*

– 8 –
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Fund.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations for the establishment and
administration of [assessment rates,] payments and penalties.
[Assessment rates must result in an equitable distribution of costs
among the self-insured employers and must be based upon expected
annual expenditures for claims for payments from the Subsequent
Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers.]
7. [The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any self-insured
employer who wishes to appeal the rate so filed must do so pursuant
to NRS 679B.310.
8.] The Administrator shall:
(a) Evaluate any claim submitted to the Board for payment or
reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured
Employers and recommend to the Board any appropriate action to
be taken concerning the claim; and
(b) Submit to the Board any other recommendations relating to
the Account.
Sec. 7. NRS 616B.557 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.557 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.560:
1. If an employee of a self-insured employer has a permanent
physical impairment from any cause or origin and incurs , on or
before September 30, 2025, a subsequent disability by injury arising
out of and in the course of his or her employment which entitles the
employee to compensation for disability that is substantially greater
by reason of the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and
the subsequent injury than that which would have resulted from the
subsequent injury alone, the compensation due must be charged to
the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee incurred on or
before September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is
determined that the death would not have occurred except for the
preexisting permanent physical impairment, the compensation due
must be charged to the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured
Employers in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
-
*AB332*

– 9 –
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers, the self-
insured employer must establish by written records that the self-
insured employer had knowledge of the “permanent physical
impairment” at the time the employee was hired or that the
employee was retained in employment after the self-insured
employer acquired such knowledge.
5. A self-insured employer must submit to the Board a claim
for reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-
Insured Employers.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing procedures
for submitting claims against the Subsequent Injury Account for
Self-Insured Employers. The Board shall notify the self-insured
employer of its decision on such a claim within 120 days after the
claim is received.
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers must be
submitted directly to the district court.
Sec. 8. NRS 616B.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.560 1. A self-insured employer who pays
compensation due to an employee who has a permanent physical
impairment from any cause or origin and incurs , on or before
September 30, 2025, a subsequent disability by injury arising out of
and in the course of his or her employment which entitles the
employee to compensation for disability that is substantially greater
by reason of the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and
the subsequent injury than that which would have resulted from the
subsequent injury alone is entitled to be reimbursed from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers if:
(a) The employee knowingly made a false representation as to
his or her physical condition at the time the employee was hired by
the self-insured employer;
(b) The self-insured employer relied upon the false
representation and this reliance formed a substantial basis of the
employment; and
(c) A causal connection existed between the false representation
and the subsequent disability.
 If the subsequent injury of the employee incurred on or before
September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is determined
that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting
permanent physical impairment, any compensation paid is entitled
-
*AB332*

– 10 –
to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-
Insured Employers.
2. A self-insured employer shall notify the Board of any
possible claim against the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-
Insured Employers pursuant to this section no later than 60 days
after the date of the subsequent injury or the date the self-insured
employer learns of the employee’s false representation, whichever is
later.
Sec. 9. NRS 616B.575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.575 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers, which may be used only to make payments in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 616B.578 and 616B.581.
The Board shall administer the Account based upon
recommendations made by the Administrator pursuant to subsection
[8.] 7.
2. All [assessments,] penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the Board for the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers must be delivered to the custody of the State
Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees of members of Associations of Self-
Insured Public or Private Employers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the Board.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Account.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations for the establishment and
administration of [assessment rates,] payments and penalties.
[Assessment rates must result in an equitable distribution of costs
among the associations of self-insured public or private employers
and must be based upon expected annual expenditures for claims for
payments from the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of
Self-Insured Public or Private Employers.]
7. [The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any association
of self-insured public or private employers that wishes to appeal the
rate so filed must do so pursuant to NRS 679B.310.
-
*AB332*

– 11 –
8.] The Administrator shall:
(a) Evaluate any claim submitted to the Board for payment or
reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers and
recommend to the Board any appropriate action to be taken
concerning the claim; and
(b) Submit to the Board any other recommendations relating to
the Account.
Sec. 10. NRS 616B.578 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.578 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.581:
1. If an employee of a member of an association of self-insured
public or private employers has a permanent physical impairment
from any cause or origin and incurs , on or before September 30,
2025, a subsequent disability by injury arising out of and in the
course of his or her employment which entitles the employee to
compensation for disability that is substantially greater by reason of
the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and the
subsequent injury than that which would have resulted from the
subsequent injury alone, the compensation due must be charged to
the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured
Public or Private Employers in accordance with regulations adopted
by the Board.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee incurred on or
before September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is
determined that the death would not have occurred except for the
preexisting permanent physical impairment, the compensation due
must be charged to the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations
of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Board.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers, the association of self-insured public or
private employers must establish by written records that the
employer had knowledge of the “permanent physical impairment” at
-
*AB332*

– 12 –
the time the employee was hired or that the employee was retained
in employment after the employer acquired such knowledge.
5. An association of self-insured public or private employers
must submit to the Board a claim for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing procedures
for submitting claims against the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers. The
Board shall notify the Association of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers of its decision on such a claim within 120 days after the
claim is received.
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured
Public or Private Employers must be submitted directly to the
district court.
Sec. 11. NRS 616B.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.581 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers that pays compensation due to an employee who has a
permanent physical impairment from any cause or origin and incurs
, on or before September 30, 2025, a subsequent disability by injury
arising out of and in the course of his or her employment which
entitles the employee to compensation for disability that is
substantially greater by reason of the combined effects of the
preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than that which
would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone is entitled to
be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations
of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers if:
(a) The employee knowingly made a false representation as to
his or her physical condition at the time the employee was hired by
the member of the Association of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers;
(b) The employer relied upon the false representation and this
reliance formed a substantial basis of the employment; and
(c) A causal connection existed between the false representation
and the subsequent disability.
 If the subsequent injury of the employee incurred on or before
September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is determined
that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting
permanent physical impairment, any compensation paid is entitled
to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers.
2. An association of self-insured public or private employers
shall notify the Board of any possible claim against the Subsequent
Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private
-
*AB332*

– 13 –
Employers pursuant to this section no later than 60 days after the
date of the subsequent injury or the date the employer learns of the
employee’s false representation, whichever is later.
Sec. 12. NRS 616B.584 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.584 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers, which may be used
only to make payments in accordance with the provisions of NRS
616B.587 and 616B.590. The Administrator shall administer the
Account.
2. All [assessments,] penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the Administrator for
the Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers must be
delivered to the custody of the State Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees whose employers are insured by
private carriers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the State Controller.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Account.
6. The Administrator shall adopt regulations for the
establishment and administration of [assessment rates,] payments
and penalties. [Assessment rates must reflect the relative hazard of
the employments covered by private carriers, must result in an
equitable distribution of costs among the private carriers and must
be based upon expected annual premiums to be received.
7. The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any private
carrier who wishes to appeal the rate so filed must do so pursuant to
NRS 679B.310.]
Sec. 13. NRS 616B.587 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.587 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.590:
1. If an employee of an employer who is insured by a private
carrier has a permanent physical impairment from any cause or
origin and incurs , on or before September 30, 2025, a subsequent
disability by injury arising out of and in the course of his or her
employment which entitles the employee to compensation for
disability that is substantially greater by reason of the combined
effects of the preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than
-
*AB332*

– 14 –
that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone,
the compensation due must be charged to the Subsequent Injury
Account for Private Carriers in accordance with regulations adopted
by the Administrator.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee incurred on or
before September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is
determined that the death would not have occurred except for the
preexisting permanent physical impairment, the compensation due
must be charged to the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Administrator.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers, the private carrier
must establish by written records that the employer had knowledge
of the “permanent physical impairment” at the time the employee
was hired or that the employee was retained in employment after the
employer acquired such knowledge.
5. A private carrier must submit to the Administrator a claim
for reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers.
6. The Administrator shall adopt regulations establishing
procedures for submitting claims against the Subsequent Injury
Account for Private Carriers. The Administrator shall notify the
private carrier of his or her decision on such a claim within 120 days
after the claim is received.
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers must be
submitted directly to the appeals officer. The appeals officer shall
hear such an appeal within 45 days after the appeal is submitted to
the appeals officer.
Sec. 14. NRS 616B.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.590 1. A private carrier who pays compensation due to
an employee who has a permanent physical impairment from any
cause or origin and incurs , on or before September 30, 2025, a
-
*AB332*

– 15 –
subsequent disability by injury arising out of and in the course of his
or her employment which entitles the employee to compensation for
disability that is substantially greater by reason of the combined
effects of the preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than
that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone is
entitled to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Private Carriers if:
(a) The employee knowingly made a false representation as to
his or her physical condition at the time the employee was hired by
the employer insured by a private carrier;
(b) The employer relied upon the false representation and this
reliance formed a substantial basis of the employment; and
(c) A causal connection existed between the false representation
and the subsequent disability.
 If the subsequent injury of the employee incurred on or before
September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is determined
that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting
permanent physical impairment, any compensation paid is entitled
to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers.
2. A private carrier shall notify the Administrator of any
possible claim against the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers pursuant to this section no later than 60 days after the date
of the subsequent injury or the date the employer learns of the
employee’s false representation, whichever is later.
Sec. 15. NRS 616B.624 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.624 1. If a quasi-public or private corporation or a
limited-liability company is required to be insured pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of NRS, an officer of the
corporation or a manager of the company who:
(a) Receives pay for services performed as an officer [,] or
manager [or employee] of the corporation or company shall be
deemed for the purposes of those chapters to receive a minimum pay
of $6,000 per policy year and a maximum pay of $36,000 per policy
year.
(b) Does not receive pay for services performed as an officer,
manager or employee of the corporation or company shall be
deemed for the purposes of those chapters to receive a minimum pay
of $500 per month or $6,000 per policy year.
2. An officer or manager who does not receive pay for services
performed as an officer, manager or employee of the corporation or
company may elect to reject coverage for himself or herself by filing
written notice thereof with the corporation or company and the
insurer. The rejection is effective upon receipt of the notice by the
insurer.
-
*AB332*

– 16 –
3. An officer or manager of such a corporation or company
who:
(a) Owns the corporation or company; and
(b) Receives pay for the services performed,
 may elect to reject coverage for himself or herself by filing
written notice thereof with the insurer. The rejection is effective
upon receipt of the notice by the insurer.
4. An officer or manager who has rejected coverage may
rescind that rejection by filing written notice thereof with the
corporation or company and the insurer. The rescission is effective
upon receipt of the notice by the insurer. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3, if an officer or manager who has rejected
coverage receives pay for services performed as an officer, manager
or employee of the corporation or company, the officer or manager
shall be deemed to have rescinded that rejection.
5. A nonprofit corporation whose officers do not receive pay
for services performed as officers or employees of the corporation
may elect to reject coverage for its current officers and all future
officers who do not receive such pay by filing written notice thereof
with the corporation and the insurer. The rejection is effective upon
receipt of the notice by the insurer.
6. A nonprofit corporation which has rejected coverage for its
officers who do not receive pay for services performed as officers or
employees of the corporation may rescind that rejection by filing
written notice thereof with the corporation and the insurer. The
rescission is effective upon receipt of the notice by the insurer. If an
officer of a nonprofit corporation which has rejected coverage
receives pay for services performed as an officer or employee of the
corporation, the corporation shall be deemed to have rescinded that
rejection.
Sec. 16. 1. The provisions of any administrative regulations
which conflict or are inconsistent with the provisions of this act are
void, including, without limitation, the provisions of any
administrative regulations which impose an assessment relating to a
subsequent injury account pursuant to NRS 616B.554, 616B.575 or
616B.584, as those sections existed before October 1, 2025.
2. As used in this section, “subsequent injury account” means:
(a) The Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers
created by NRS 616B.554;
(b) The Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-
Insured Public or Private Employers created by NRS 616B.575; and
(c) The Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers created
by NRS 616B.584.
-
*AB332*

– 17 –
Sec. 17. The amendatory provisions of sections 6 to 14,
inclusive, and 16 of this act do not affect a claim, action or
proceeding commenced or right accrued before October 1, 2025.
Sec. 18. NRS 616B.222 and 616B.410 are hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
616B.222 Determination of total amount paid to employees
for services performed during policy year. To determine the
total amount paid to employees for services performed, the
maximum amount paid to any one employee during a policy year
shall be deemed to be $36,000.
616B.410 Annual audits; objection to assignment of
standard industrial classification.
1. The Commissioner shall cause to be conducted at least
annually an audit of each association of self-insured public or
private employers in order to verify:
(a) The standard industrial classification of each member of the
association;
(b) The individual experience of each member of the
association;
(c) The payroll of each member of the association; and
(d) The assessment required to be paid by each member of the
association.
2. The audit required by this section must be conducted by an
auditor approved by the Commissioner.
3. A report of the audit must be filed with the Commissioner in
a form required by the Commissioner.
4. The association or any member of the association may
request a hearing before the Commissioner to object to any standard
industrial classification assigned to a member of the association as a
result of the audit. If the Commissioner determines that the
assessment required to be paid by any member of the association is:
(a) Insufficient because of the standard industrial classification
assigned to the member, the Commissioner shall order the
association to collect from that member any amount required to
recover the deficiency.
(b) Excessive because of the standard industrial classification
assigned to the member, the Commissioner shall order the
association to pay to the member the excess amount collected.
-
*AB332*

– 18 –
5. The expenses of any audit conducted pursuant to this section
must be paid by the association.
H
-
*AB332*